Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2491.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1361, 1362 and 1726-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1361. When Provided.--[(1)] The board of school directors in any school district may, out of the funds of the district, provide for the free transportation of any resident pupil to and from the kindergarten, elementary school, or secondary school in which he is lawfully enrolled, provided that such school is not operated for profit and is located within the district boundaries or outside the district boundaries at a 123456789101112131415161718192021 distance not exceeding ten miles by the nearest public highway, except that such ten-mile limit shall not apply to area career and technical schools which regularly serve eligible district pupils or to special schools and classes approved by the Department of Education, and to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips for any purpose connected with the educational pursuits of the pupils. When provision is made by a board of school directors for the transportation of public school pupils to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided, the board of school directors shall also make identical provision for the free transportation of pupils who regularly attend nonpublic kindergarten, elementary and high schools not operated for profit to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided. Such transportation of pupils attending nonpublic schools shall be provided during regular school hours on such dates and periods that the nonpublic school not operated for profit is in regular session, according to the school calendar officially adopted by the directors of the same in accordance with provisions of law. The board of school directors shall provide such transportation whenever so required by any of the provisions of this act or of any other act of Assembly. The board of school directors shall provide free transportation of any resident pupil attending a charter school in accordance with section 1726-A.[(2) The board of school directors in any school district may, if the board deems it to the best interest of the school district, for the purposes of transporting pupils as required or 20260HB2491PN3367 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized by any of the provisions of this act or of any other act of the Assembly, appropriate funds for urban common carrier mass transportation purposes from current revenues to urban common carrier mass transportation authorities to assist the authorities to meet costs of operation, maintenance, capital improvements, and debt service. Said contributions shall not be subject to reimbursement by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations, including qualifications of school bus drivers, to govern the transportation of school pupils.]Section 1362. Kinds of Transportation; Liability Insurance.--(a) The free transportation of pupils, as required or authorized by this act, or any other act, may be furnished by using either school conveyances, private conveyances, or electric railways, or other common carriers, when the total distance which any pupil must travel by the public highway to or from school, in addition to such transportation, does not exceed one and one-half (1 1/2) miles, and when stations or other proper shelters are provided for the use of such pupils where needed, and when the highway, road, or traffic conditions are not such that walking constitutes a hazard to the safety of the child, as so certified by the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation shall take into account the presence of sidewalks along the highway, but such presence or lack thereof shall not be controlling and the department shall consider all relevant safety factors in making its determination as to whether or not walking constitutes a hazard to pupils. All private motor vehicles employed in transporting pupils for hire shall be adequately covered by public liability insurance in such amount as the board of school directors shall require.20260HB2491PN3367 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) When free transportation is provided to resident pupils attending a district school, charter school, regional charter school or approved private school, no pupil in kindergarten through grade six shall be transported via any common carrier.Section 1726-A. Transportation.--(a) Students who attend a charter school located in their school district of residence, a regional charter school of which the school district is a part or a charter school located outside district boundaries at a distance not exceeding ten (10) miles by the nearest public highway shall be provided free transportation under the same terms and conditions, including mode of transportation, as transportation is provided to students attending the schools of the district to the charter school by their school district of residence on such dates and periods that the charter school is in regular session whether or not transportation is provided on such dates and periods to students attending schools of the district. Transportation is not required for elementary students, including kindergarten students, residing within one and one-half (1.5) miles or for secondary students. [residing within two (2) miles of the nearest public highway from the charter school in which the students are enrolled unless the road or traffic conditions are such that walking constitutes a hazard to the safety of the students when so certified by the Department of Transportation, except that if the school district provides transportation to the public schools of the school district for elementary students, including kindergarten students, residing within one and one-half (1.5) miles or for secondary students residing within two (2) miles of the nearest public highway under nonhazardous conditions, transportation shall also be provided to charter schools under the same 20260HB2491PN3367 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conditions. Districts providing transportation to a charter school outside the district and, for the 2007-2008 school year and each school year thereafter, districts providing transportation to a charter school within the district shall be eligible for payments under section 2509.3 for each public school student transported.(a.1) In addition to any other requirements in this section, school districts of the first class shall provide transportation to students who attend a charter school if they are the same age or are enrolled in the same grade, grades or their grade equivalents as any of the students of the school district for whom transportation is provided under any program or policy to the schools of the school district.(b) In the event that the Secretary of Education determines that a school district is not providing the required transportation to students to the charter school, the Department of Education shall pay directly to the charter school funds for costs incurred in the transportation of its students. Payments to a charter school shall be determined in the following manner: for each eligible student transported, the charter school shall receive a payment equal to the total expenditures for transportation of the school district divided by the total number of school students transported by the school district under any program or policy.(c) The department shall deduct the amount paid to the charter school under subsection (b) from any and all payments made to the district.(d) A school district of the first class shall submit a copy of its current transportation policy to the department no later than August 1 of each year.]20260HB2491PN3367 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2491PN3367 - 6 - 1